Utah statutes.
39-2-7.   Budget -- Annual legislative approval.
For the use of the State Armory Board, and for the purpose of payment of
rentals for armories, and for the purpose of paying interest on any sum
borrowed by said board for the erection of armories, and for the purpose of
construction of new armories or other military facilities, the adjutant
general shall prepare and submit to the governor, to be included in his budget
to be submitted to the Legislature, a budget of the requirements for the
expenses of the Utah National Guard in carrying out the provisions of law for
the fiscal year next following the convening of the Legislature.
